South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3107.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 3, Title 16 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 16-3-100.  Any fertilized human egg or human embryo that exists in any form outside of the uterus of a human body shall not, under any circumstance, be considered an unborn child, a minor child, an unborn person, an unborn fetus, a natural person, or any other term that connotes a human being for any purpose under state law including, but not limited, under any provision of Chapter 3, Title 16 or Chapter 41, Title 44. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----